Florida, session 2026, SB872.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 15 16 Section 1.âSubsection (2) of section 633.408, Florida 17 Statutes, is amended, and subsection (10) is added to that 18 section, to read: 19 633.408âFirefighter and volunteer firefighter training and 20 certification.â 21 (2)âExcept as provided in subsection (10), courses under 22 subsection (1) may only be administered by education or training 23 providers approved by the division pursuant to s. 633.128(1)(c) 24 and taught by instructors certified pursuant to s. 25 633.128(1)(d). 26 (10)âIf the division determines that another stateâs 27 training and certification requirements or examinations are 28 substantially equivalent or more stringent than those required 29 under this chapter, the division must accept such substantially 30 similar training and certification for certification in this 31 state. Before the division may deny a certificate under this 32 section, the division must make a finding that the basis 33 certificate in another jurisdiction is substantially equivalent 34 to or is otherwise insufficient for certification in this state. 35 As used in this subsection, the term âbasis certificateâ means 36 the certificate or training requirements of another jurisdiction 37 which are used to meet the requirements for certification in 38 this state. 39 Section 2.âPresent paragraph (c) of subsection (7) of 40 section 633.508, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 41 (d), and a new paragraph (c) is added to that subsection, to 42 read: 43 633.508âWorkplace safety; rulemaking authority; division 44 authority.â 45 (7)âThe division shall adopt rules relating to all of the 46 following: 47 (c)âProhibiting firefighter employers from requiring that 48 their firefighter employees take their personal protective 49 equipment or firefighting gear home if such equipment or gear is 50 contaminated. 51 Section 3.âParagraph (c) is added to subsection (2) of 52 section 633.520, Florida Statutes, to read: 53 633.520âSafety; firefighter employer responsibilities.â 54 (2)âThe division shall adopt rules to establish: 55 (c)âEmployersâ best practices related to contaminated 56 personal protective equipment or firefighting gear. 57 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.